North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-10 The State Board of Higher Education
15-10-38.1.
Skilled workforce student loan repayment program — Skilled workforce student loan repayment program fund — Continuing appropriation — Report. [Repealed effective July 1, 2023]

There is created in the state treasury the skilled workforce student loan repayment program fund. The fund consists of moneys transferred into the fund by the legislative assembly, matching funds received, and loan repayments. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the state board of higher education on a continuing basis for the purpose of distributing student loan repayment grants directly to the Bank of North Dakota or other participating lender to repay outstanding student loan principal balances for eligible applicants.

The state board of higher education shall adopt policies and procedures to develop, implement, promote, and administer a skilled workforce student loan repayment program in cooperation with the Bank of North Dakota and the North Dakota workforce development council with the intent of attracting and retaining individuals for professional or technical skills in high demand in this state.

The North Dakota workforce development council in cooperation with job service North Dakota shall use available labor market information to determine annually the eligible high-demand professional and technical skills and emerging occupations in this state.

Graduates of degree or certificate programs from institutions or entities in any state may apply for the skilled workforce student loan repayment program. To be eligible to receive student loan repayment grants under the program, the applicant:

Must have successfully completed an educational program from an institution of higher education;

Must have a student loan with the Bank of North Dakota or other participating lender;

Following completion of an educational program, must reside and work in this state in an eligible high-demand or emerging occupation; and

Must have met and shall continue to meet any requirements established in applicable state board of higher education procedures.

The state board of higher education shall adopt procedures to ensure compliance with residency and occupation requirements after completion of the educational program.

The state board of higher education shall distribute student loan repayment grants from the skilled workforce student loan repayment program fund directly to the Bank of North Dakota or other participating lender to repay outstanding student loan principal balances for eligible applicants. The maximum annual student loan repayment grant amount for which an applicant may qualify is five thousand six hundred sixty-seven dollars, or one-third of the applicant’s outstanding student loan principal balance upon initial application for the program, whichever is less. The maximum total student loan repayment grant amount for which any applicant may qualify is seventeen thousand dollars.

If an individual is receiving loan forgiveness under any other state program, the individual may not receive a student loan repayment grant under this section during the same application year. An individual who received a skilled workforce scholarship under section 15-10-38.2 is not eligible for loan forgiveness under this section.

An individual may receive a combined total of no more than seventeen thousand dollars under this section and the skilled workforce scholarship program under section 15-10-38.2.

The skilled workforce student loan repayment program must be a joint public and private effort. The state board of higher education shall provide one dollar of funding for each one dollar of funding raised from the private sector. Any matching funds received must be deposited in the skilled workforce student loan repayment program fund.

The state board of higher education shall provide a biennial program report to the legislative management by September first of each even-numbered year. The report must include information regarding:

The eligible high-demand professional and technical skills and emerging occupations;

The number of applicants, eligible applicants, and applicants receiving awards;

The amount of private funding raised; and

The average and total amounts awarded under the program.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 136, § 1, effective April 26, 2019; 2021, ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; repealed by 2021, ch. 126, § 5, effective July 1, 2023.

Note.

Section 15-10-38.1 was amended 1 time and repealed by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-2-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 1 of Chapter 126, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2272; and Section 5 of Chapter 126, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2272.

This section is set out above to reflect a correction from the state since the 2019 cumulative supplement. In subsection 8, “section 2 of this Act” was changed to “ section 15-10-38.2”.

15-10-38.2.
Skilled workforce scholarship program — Skilled workforce scholarship fund — Continuing appropriation — Report. [Repealed effective July 1, 2023]

There is created in the state treasury the skilled workforce scholarship fund. The fund consists of moneys transferred into the fund by the legislative assembly, matching funds received, and scholarship repayments. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the state board of higher education on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing grants to institutions of higher education related to skilled workforce scholarships. Institutions of higher education include institutions under the control of the state board of higher education, North Dakota nonpublic accredited institutions of higher education, tribally controlled community colleges, state-approved educator training programs, and North Dakota institutions approved to operate by the North Dakota board of career and technical education.

The state board of higher education shall adopt policies and procedures to develop, implement, promote, and administer a skilled workforce scholarship program in cooperation with the Bank of North Dakota and the North Dakota workforce development council with the intent of attracting and retaining individuals for professional or technical skills in high demand in this state.

The North Dakota workforce development council in cooperation with job service North Dakota shall use available labor market information to determine annually the eligible high-demand professional and technical skills and emerging occupations in this state.

The state board of higher education and the workforce development council shall compile a list of qualifying educational programs annually. A qualifying educational program is a program resulting in attainment of an associate’s degree or lower credential upon successful completion or a program that may be completed within four semesters or six quarters. A qualifying educational program also must pertain to the professional and technical skills and emerging occupations in high demand in this state, as determined under subsection 3. Qualifying educational programs may include degree or certificate programs.

Individuals enrolled in a qualifying educational program in this state may apply for a scholarship under this section. Scholarships are limited to the amount charged each quarter, semester, or term by the educational institution for the tuition, fees, books, and supplies required for the qualifying educational program. The scholarships are intended to supplement any other scholarship or financial aid grant received by a student to assist the student with the costs of the qualifying educational program. An individual may not receive a combined total exceeding seventeen thousand dollars under this section and the skilled workforce loan repayment program under section 15-10-38.1.

To be eligible for a scholarship and payment under this section, a student must be enrolled full time in an eligible program and have at least a 2.5 cumulative grade point average, based on a 4.0 grading system, or maintain academic progress in the program according to program requirements. A student may not receive scholarships under this section for more than the equivalent of four semesters of full-time enrollment or six quarters of full-time enrollment.

Upon completion of a qualifying educational program, a student who received a scholarship under this section must reside and work in this state in an eligible high-demand or emerging occupation for a minimum of three years.

An individual shall repay the scholarship pursuant to the terms in the individual’s scholarship award agreement if the individual fails to maintain either a 2.5 cumulative grade point average or academic progress according to program requirements while enrolled, withdraws voluntarily or involuntarily before the completion of the program for which a scholarship has been received, or fails to reside and work in this state in an eligible high-demand or emerging occupation for at least three years following degree or certificate completion.

The state board of higher education, in conjunction with the Bank of North Dakota, may allow an individual who received payment under this section to delay or cancel repayment under this section due to financial difficulty, military service, death, or total disability.

Each quarter, semester, or term, the state board of higher education shall distribute grants to institutions of higher education to provide the amounts necessary for the scholarships awarded to the students enrolled in each institution.

The skilled workforce scholarship program must be a joint public and private effort. The state board of higher education may distribute grants only to the extent that the private sector has provided one dollar of matching funds for each dollar of funding provided by the state. Any matching funds received must be deposited in the skilled workforce scholarship fund.

The state board of higher education shall provide a biennial program report to the legislative management by September first of each even-numbered year. The report must include information regarding:

The eligible high-demand professional and technical skills and emerging occupations;

The qualifying educational programs;

The number of applicants, eligible applicants, and applicants receiving awards;

The amount of private funding raised; and

The average and total amounts awarded under the program.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 136, § 2, effective April 26, 2019; 2021, ch. 126, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 15-10-38.2 was amended 1 time and repealed by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-2-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 2 of Chapter 126, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2272; and Section 5 of Chapter 126, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2272.

15-10-38.2.
Skilled workforce scholarship program — Skilled workforce scholarship fund — Continuing appropriation — Report. [Repealed effective July 1, 2023]

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 136, § 2, effective April 26, 2019; 2021, ch. 126, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; repealed by 2021, ch. 126, § 5, effective July 1, 2023.

15-10-38.3.
Scholarship and loan forgiveness administrative costs — Continuing appropriation. (Effective through July 31, 2023)

The state board of higher education shall retain up to one and one-half percent of any funds appropriated to the board under subsection 1 of section 15-10-38.1 and subsection 1 of section 15-10-38.2. The retained funds must be used for promotion and administration of the programs under those sections.

15-10-38.3. Scholarship and loan forgiveness administrative costs — Continuing appropriation. (Effective August 1, 2023)

The state board of higher education shall retain up to one-half of one percent of any funds appropriated to the board under subsection 1 of section 15-10-38.1 and subsection 1 of section 15-10-38.2. The retained funds must be used for administration of the programs under those sections.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 126, § 3, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 126, § 4, effective August 1, 2023.

Note.

Section 15-10-38.3 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 126,

Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2272; and Section 4 of Chapter 126, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2272.

15-10-38.4.
Dual-credit courses — Tuition scholarship program — Administered by the board.

The state board of higher education shall administer a dual-credit tuition scholarship program to offer a tuition scholarship to students. The board shall adopt procedures to administer the program.

An eligible student may apply to the board to receive a scholarship toward the cost of tuition and fees at the in-state public, private, or tribal institution of higher education at which the student is enrolled. To be eligible to receive a scholarship, an individual must:

Be enrolled and have completed at least one semester, quarter, or term at a public, private, or tribal institution of higher education in the state;

Have:

Graduated from a high school in the state;

Graduated from a high school in a bordering state under chapter 15.1-29;

Graduated from a nonpublic high school in a bordering state while residing with a custodial parent in this state; or

Completed a program of home education under chapter 15.1-23; and

Have completed at least one dual-credit course provided by an institution under the control of the state board of higher education while enrolled in high school or a program of home education in the state.

The state board of higher education shall provide an eligible student with a tuition scholarship equal to fifty percent of the cost of the dual-credit courses provided by an institution under the control of the state board of higher education, and completed by the student while in high school or a program of home education, in an amount up to seven hundred fifty dollars. A scholarship received by a student during any semester, quarter, or term of enrollment under this section may not exceed the cost of tuition and fees for the semester, quarter, or term. A student is not eligible to receive more than seven hundred fifty dollars under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

15-10-39.
Fees — Room and meals — Authorization.

An institution of higher education may charge a fee for room and meals when provided by the institution in connection with summer programs at the institution for which high school credit is awarded. If a student or the student’s parent or guardian is unable to pay the fee for room and meals, the institution shall waive the fee.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 132, § 1.

15-10-40.
Long-term lease and leaseback transaction revenue.

The board shall use revenue earned from long-term lease and leaseback transactions under chapter 54-01 for the repair and upkeep of campus buildings commonly referred to as deferred maintenance projects.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 342, § 2.

15-10-41.
Centers of excellence. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 16.

15-10-42.
Faculty — English pronunciation — Policy — Report.

The state board of higher education shall create a policy for all institutions under its control, relating to the assessment of faculty and teaching assistant communication skills, including the ability to speak English clearly and with good pronunciation, the notification to students of opportunities to file complaints, the process for responding to student complaints, and the resolution of reported communication problems.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 144, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 5.

15-10-43.
Veterinary medical education program — Kansas state university — Contract.

In addition to any contracts under section 15-10-28.2, the state board of higher education may contract with Kansas state university to provide an opportunity for up to five eligible students to enroll in the veterinary medical education program at Kansas state university.

Eligible students must be residents of this state and must have been selected for enrollment by an admissions committee consisting of one faculty member appointed by the vice president for agricultural affairs at North Dakota state university, one veterinarian practicing in this state, one member of the legislative assembly, and one livestock producer, all of whom must be appointed by the legislative management, and the chairman of the admissions committee at the Kansas state university school of veterinary medicine. The legislative management and the chairman of the admissions committee at the Kansas state university school of veterinary medicine may select an alternative for each of the designated positions to serve as necessary.

The admissions committee shall determine the criteria to be used in the selection of eligible students, with eligible students interested in large animal veterinary medicine receiving a priority.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 145, § 1; 2007, ch. 3, §§ 26, 27; 2009, ch. 482, § 6; 2019, ch. 137, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 29 of chapter 3, Session Laws 2007 provides: “

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION

. Section 27 of this Act [which amends this section] applies retroactively to students participating in the Kansas state university veterinary medicine program.”

15-10-43.1.
Professional student exchange programs — Bank of North Dakota — Agreements — Repayment.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 3, § 12, effective July 1, 2019; repealed by 2021, ch. 128, § 2, effective May 10, 2021.

15-10-43.2.
Professional student exchange programs — Repayment waiver.

The state board of higher education shall waive repayment requirements for individuals participating in a professional student exchange program in veterinary medicine, dentistry, or optometry who entered an agreement with the state board of higher education pursuant to repealed section 15-10-43.1 during the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, and ending June 30, 2021.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 128, § 1, effective May 10, 2021.

15-10-44.
Higher education information technology — Board duties — Reports.

The state board of higher education shall manage and regulate information technology planning and services for institutions under its control, including:

Development of information technology policies, standards, and guidelines in coordination with the information technology department.

Implementation of a process for project management oversight and reporting.

Integration of higher education information technology planning and reporting with the board’s strategic planning process and annual performance and accountability report required by section 15-10-14.2.

Participation in internet2 or other advanced higher education or research-related networking projects as provided in section 54-59-08.

Development of an annual report concerning higher education information technology planning and services.

Requiring utilization by each institution under the control and supervision of the board of systemwide electronic mail services provided by the board for all public business electronic correspondence.

Development and implementation of an electronic mail retention policy for the board and institutions under the supervision and control of the board which requires retention of nonstudent employee electronic mail messages for at least two years after the creation or receipt of the message.

The state board of higher education shall collaborate with the information technology department to coordinate higher education information technology planning with statewide information technology planning.

The state board of higher education shall provide advice to the information technology department regarding the development of policies, standards, and guidelines relating to access to or use of wide area network services as provided by section 54-59-09.

The state board of higher education shall present information regarding higher education information technology planning, services, and major projects to the information technology committee on request of the committee.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 154, § 1; 2015, ch. 130, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 130, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

15-10-44.1.
Required use of electronic mail, file server administration, database administration, application server, and hosting services.

Each institution and entity under the control of the state board of higher education shall obtain electronic mail, file server administration, database administration, research computing, storage, application server, and hosting services through a delivery system established by the board. The board shall establish policies and guidelines for the delivery of services, including the transition from existing systems to functional consolidation, with consideration given to the creation of efficiencies, cost-savings, and improved quality of service.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 8, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This chapter became effective July 1, 2015.

15-10-44.2.
Audits of computer systems — Penalty.

Any auditor hired to conduct audits of the state board of higher education and the entities under the control and supervision of the board may:

Conduct a review and assessment of any computer system or related security system of the state board of higher education or any entity under the control and supervision of the board. A review and assessment under this section may include an assessment of system vulnerability, network penetration, any potential security breach, and the susceptibility of the system to cyber attack or cyber fraud.

Disclose the findings of a review and assessment to an individual or committee designated by the state board of higher education or to the board. Any record relating to a review and assessment, including a working paper or preliminary draft of a review and assessment report and a report of the findings of a review and assessment, and any record that may cause or perpetuate vulnerability of a computer system or related security system which is obtained or created during a review and assessment is an exempt record.

In conjunction with the state board of higher education or a committee designated by the board, procure the services of a specialist in information security systems or any other contractor deemed necessary in conducting a review and assessment under this section.

Any person hired or contracted to provide services in relation to a review and assessment under this section is subject to the privacy and confidentiality provisions of subsection 1 and any other section of law, including section 44-04-27, and for the purposes of section 12.1-13-01, is a public servant.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 9, effective May 14, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective May 14, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 48 of chapter 3, S.L. 2015.

15-10-44.3.
Internal auditors’ working papers.

For purposes of this section, “higher education internal auditor” means an internal auditor of the North Dakota university system and the institutions under the control of the state board of higher education. Working papers of a higher education internal auditor are not public records and are exempt from section 44-04-18. Working papers include records kept by a higher education internal auditor of the procedures applied, the tests performed, the information obtained, draft audit reports, and the pertinent conclusions reached in the audit engagement. At the discretion of a higher education internal auditor, working papers of a higher education internal auditor may be made available for inspection. A draft audit report released to the governing body or management of the audited entity is confidential until the final audit report is issued or work ceases on the audit. The issued audit report is public information. The working papers of an issued audit report are public except for any information designated as confidential or exempt from disclosure by state or federal law. At the discretion of a higher education internal auditor, all or a portion of the working papers of the higher education internal auditor of an issued audit report may be declared confidential. The declaration of confidentiality must state the reason for the confidentiality and the date, as reasonably may be determined at the time, when the working papers will be made public.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 129, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

15-10-45.
Telecommunications and information services competition prohibited — Report.

The northern tier network, part of a national research network infrastructure, serves entities within and outside this state. The North Dakota university system may use the northern tier network infrastructure only for the purpose of supporting the research and education missions of the North Dakota university system. The North Dakota university system may not use the northern tier network infrastructure for traditional internet, voice, video, or other telecommunications services beyond those required for research networks.

The North Dakota university system or any entity associated with the university system may not resell any portion of the northern tier network infrastructure to nonuniversity entities other than research collaborators.

The northern tier network may not replace any wide area network services to any city, county, or school district which are provided by the information technology department under section 54-59-08.

The North Dakota university system shall provide a comprehensive biennial report of northern tier network activities for the 2007-09 biennium and must submit to a biennial audit of the northern tier network activities beginning with the 2009-11 biennium.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 154, § 2.

15-10-46.
University of North Dakota fighting Sioux nickname and logo. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011 Sp., ch. 580, § 2.

15-10-46.1.
University of North Dakota athletic nickname and logo.

Neither the state board of higher education nor the university of North Dakota may adopt or implement an athletic nickname or corresponding logo before January 1, 2015.

Source:

S.L. 2011 Sp., ch. 580, § 1.

Effective Date.

This section became effective December 1, 2011.

15-10-47.
Construction projects at institutions of higher education — Variance reports.

Whenever any new construction, renovation, or repair, valued at more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars is underway on the campus of an institution of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education, the board shall provide semiannual project variance reports to the director of the office of management and budget. Each report must include:

The name or a description of the project;

The expenditure authorized by the legislative assembly;

The amount of the original contract;

The amount of any change orders;

The amount of any potential or anticipated change orders;

The sum of subdivisions c through e and the amount by which that sum varies from the expenditure authorized by the legislative assembly;

The total expended for the project to date; and

The scheduled date of completion as noted in the original contract and the latest available scheduled date of completion.

The state board of higher education also shall provide to the director of the office of management and budget, at the same time as the project variance report required by subsection 1:

A brief description of each change order included in subdivision d of subsection 1; and

A list of each public and nonpublic entity that has a contractually reflected financial obligation with respect to the project.

The office of management and budget shall review the information received under this section and provide reports to the budget section of the legislative management upon request.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 119, § 1; 2013, ch. 34, § 4.

15-10-48.
Advancement of academics — Matching grants — University of North Dakota and North Dakota state university.

Subject to legislative appropriations, each biennium during the period beginning July first of each odd-numbered year and ending December thirty-first of each even-numbered year, the state board of higher education shall award one dollar in matching grants for every two dollars raised by the institutional foundations of the university of North Dakota and North Dakota state university for projects dedicated exclusively to the advancement of academics.

To be eligible for a matching grant, an institution must demonstrate that:

Its foundation has raised at least fifty thousand dollars in cash or monetary pledges for a qualifying project; and

The project has been approved by the grant review committee established in section 15-10-51.

The institution is not sponsoring, partnering with, applying for grants with, or providing a grant subaward to any person or organization that performs, or promotes the performance of, an abortion unless the abortion is necessary to prevent the death of the woman, and not participating in or sponsoring any program producing, distributing, publishing, disseminating, endorsing, or approving materials of any type or from any organization, that between normal childbirth and abortion, do not give preference, encouragement, and support to normal childbirth. This paragraph does not apply to agreements entered into with medical hospitals and clinics by the university of North Dakota school of medicine and health sciences or by any nursing education program at an institution under the control of the state board of higher education.

The board may award up to one million seven hundred thousand dollars in matching grants each to the university of North Dakota and North Dakota state university; and up to one million five hundred thousand dollars in matching grants for projects at the university of North Dakota school of medicine and health sciences.

If any available dollars have not been awarded by the board before January first of each odd-numbered year, in accordance with subsection 1, either the university of North Dakota or North Dakota state university may apply for an additional matching grant.

An application submitted under this subsection must meet the same criteria as an original application.

The board shall consider each application submitted under this subsection in chronological order.

If the remaining dollars are insufficient to provide a matching grant in the amount of one dollar for every two dollars raised by the institutional foundation, the board shall award a lesser amount.

The state board of higher education shall retain up to one-quarter of one percent of any grant awarded under this section to assist with administrative expenses incurred in the grant review process.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 34, § 5; 2015, ch. 131, § 1; 2017, ch. 28, § 4, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 3, § 8, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 31, §§ 10, 17, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 130, §§ 2, 3, 6, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 131, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 15-10-48 was amended 5 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 31 of Chapter 28, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2003; Section 10 of Chapter 31, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2003; Section 3 of Chapter 130, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2030; Section 6 of Chapter 130, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2030; and Section of Chapter 130, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2030.

Section 6 of chapter 130, S.L. 2021, provides: “

REPEAL.

Subdivision d of subsection 1 of
section 15-10-48 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.”

The 2015 amendment to this section by
section 1 of chapter 131, S.L. 2015, removed the expiration date of the section.

15-10-48.1.
Clinical legal education, including indigent legal services, and faculty recruitment and retention — Matching grants — University of North Dakota school of law.

Subject to legislative appropriations, each biennium the state board of higher education shall award one dollar in matching grants for every two dollars raised by the institutional foundation of the university of North Dakota for projects dedicated exclusively to clinical legal education, including indigent legal services, or the recruitment and retention of faculty at the school of law.

To be eligible for a matching grant, the institution shall demonstrate:

Its foundation has raised at least twenty-five thousand dollars in cash or monetary pledges for a qualifying project; and

The project has been approved by the grant review committee established in section 15-10-51.

The board may award up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars in matching grants under this section.

If the remaining dollars are insufficient to provide a matching grant in the amount of one dollar for every two dollars raised by the institutional foundation, the board shall award a lesser amount.

The state board of higher education shall retain up to one-quarter of one percent of any grant awarded under this section to assist with the administrative expenses incurred in the grant review process.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 3, § 9, effective July 1, 2019.

15-10-49.
Advancement of academics — Matching grants — Two-year and four-year institutions of higher education.

Subject to legislative appropriations, each biennium during the period beginning July first of each odd-numbered year and ending December thirty-first of each even-numbered year, the state board of higher education shall award one dollar in matching grants for every two dollars raised by the institutional foundations of Bismarck state college, Dakota college at Bottineau, Dickinson state university, Lake Region state college, Mayville state university, Minot state university, North Dakota state college of science, Valley City state university, and Williston state college for projects dedicated exclusively to the advancement of academics.

To be eligible for a matching grant, an institution must demonstrate that:

Its foundation has raised at least twenty-five thousand dollars in cash or monetary pledges for a qualifying project; and

The project has been approved by the grant review committee established in section 15-10-51.

The institution is not sponsoring, partnering with, applying for grants with, or providing a grant subaward to any person or organization that performs, or promotes the performance of, an abortion unless the abortion is necessary to prevent the death of the woman, and not participating in or sponsoring any program producing, distributing, publishing, disseminating, endorsing, or approving materials of any type or from any organization, that between normal childbirth and abortion, do not give preference, encouragement, and support to normal childbirth. This paragraph does not apply to agreements entered into with medical hospitals and clinics by the university of North Dakota school of medicine and health sciences or by any nursing education program at an institution under the control of the state board of higher education.

The board may award up to:

Nine hundred fifty thousand dollars each to Bismarck state college, Minot state university, and the North Dakota state college of science;

Seven hundred thousand dollars each to Dickinson state university, Mayville state university, and Valley City state university; and

Three hundred fifty thousand dollars each to Dakota college at Bottineau, Lake Region state college, and Williston state college.

If any available dollars have not been awarded by the board before January first of each odd-numbered year, in accordance with subsection 1, any institution listed in subsection 1 may apply for an additional matching grant.

An application submitted under this subsection must meet the same criteria as an original application.

The board shall consider each application submitted under this subsection in chronological order.

If the remaining dollars are insufficient to provide a matching grant in the amount of one dollar for every two dollars raised by the institutional foundation, the board shall award a lesser amount.

The state board of higher education shall retain up to one-quarter of one percent of any grant awarded under this section to assist with administrative expenses incurred in the grant review process.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 34, § 6; 2015, ch. 131, § 2; 2017, ch. 28, § 5, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 3, § 10, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 130, § 4, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 131, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by
section 2, of chapter 131, S.L. 2015 removed the expiration date of the section.

15-10-50.
Liability for pledged amount.

If in accordance with section 15-10-48, 15-10-48.1, or 15-10-49, the state board of higher education provides grant funds to an institution, on the basis of a monetary pledge, and if the amount forthcoming is less than the amount pledged, the institutional foundation is liable to the institution for any shortfall.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 34, § 7; 2015, ch. 131, § 3; 2019, ch. 3, § 11, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 3 of chapter 131, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by
section 3 of chapter 131, S.L. 2015, removed the expiration date of the section.

15-10-51.
Grant review committee.

There is created a grant review committee consisting of:

The governor, or the governor’s designee, who shall serve as the chairman;

Two members of the house of representatives appropriations committee, selected by the majority leader of the house of representatives;

Two members of the senate appropriations committee, selected by the majority leader of the senate;

Two members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the legislative management; and

Two members appointed by the state board of higher education, with the consent of the legislative management.

The gubernatorial appointees must have an understanding of higher education’s role in advancing agriculture, the arts, commerce and finance, manufacturing, mineral extraction, natural resources, and the professions.

The grant review committee shall establish its rules of operation and procedure and shall develop and publish the criteria upon which all requests for matching grants will be reviewed.

A request for a matching grant may be presented to the committee by :

The president of the institution; or

A designee of the president.

Either presenter may be accompanied by other individuals having an expertise with respect to the project.

If the request is to be presented by a designee of a president, the designee must provide to the committee a written statement signed by the president and certifying that the president has full knowledge of all aspects of the request, as it is presented.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 34, § 8; 2015, ch. 131, § 4, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 131, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by section 4, of chapter 131, S.L. 2015, was to remove the expiration date of the section.